Idaho, session 2025, H0193.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 17, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1734J, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1734J. EASTERN SNAKE PLAIN AQUIFER RECHARGE GOAL. The Idaho water
resource board shall revise the state water plan to establish an eastern
Snake plain aquifer managed recharge goal of at least three hundred fifty
thousand (350,000) acre-feet on an average annual basis.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.